Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1713
Line of credit, defined.

Line of credit shall mean a loan in which amounts are advanced to the borrower upon his or her request from time to time, pursuant to a preexisting contract and conditional or unconditional credit approval, and in which principal amounts repaid automatically replenish the funds available under the contract.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 13.